v1.1/old/guesser.foma
#!/usr/bin/env foma -f

define Stop               [  p   |   t                 |  k     | "kw"   |  q    | "qw"       ];
define VoicedFricative    [  v   |   l  | z | y |  r   |  g     |  w     | "gh"  | "ghw"      ];
define VoicelessFricative [  f   | "ll" |   s   | "rr" | "gg"   | "wh"   | "ghh" | "ghhw" | h ];
define VoicedNasal        [  m   |   n                 | "ng"   | "ngw"                       ];
define VoicelessNasal     [ "mm" | "nn"                | "ngng" | "ngngw"                     ];

define VoicedC    [ VoicedFricative | VoicedNasal ];
define VoicelessC [ VoicelessFricative | VoicelessNasal | Stop ];

define Fricative  [ VoicelessFricative | VoicedFricative ];
define Nasal      [ VoicelessNasal     | VoicedNasal     ];

define C          [ Stop | Fricative | Nasal ];

define FullVowel   [ a   | i   | u   ];
define DoubleVowel [ a a | i i | u u ];
define V           [ e | FullVowel ];
define AnyV        [ V | DoubleVowel ];

!define YupikChar   [ C | V ];
!define ForeignChar [ ? - YupikChar ];

!define PotentialForeignWord [ ?* "-" | ?* ForeignChar ?* ];
define PotentialDem       [ (C)  V [k | m | n | q | t] | (C) AnyV (C) (C AnyV (C))* C AnyV ([k | m | n | q | t]) ];
define PotentialPtcl      [ (C) AnyV [gg | k | ll | m | ng | n | q | y] | (C) AnyV (C) (C AnyV (C))* C AnyV ([gg | k | ll | m | ng | n | q | y]) ];
define PotentialERoot     [ (C) AnyV [g | gh] | (C) AnyV (C) (C AnyV (C))* C AnyV ([g | gh]) ];
define PotentialNoun      [ (C) AnyV [g | gh] | (C) AnyV (C) (C AnyV (C))* C AnyV ([g | gh]) ];
define PotentialPosRoot   [ (C) AnyV [g | gh] | (C) AnyV (C) (C AnyV (C))* C AnyV  [g | gh]  ];
define PotentialQuantQual [ (C) AnyV       gh | (C) AnyV (C) (C AnyV (C))* C AnyV       gh   ];
define PotentialVerb      [ (C) AnyV [g | gh] | (C) AnyV (C) (C AnyV (C))* C AnyV ([g | gh]) ];


read lexc guesser.lexc
!substitute defined PotentialForeignWord for "[ForeignWordGuess]"
substitute defined PotentialDem for "[DemGuess]"
substitute defined PotentialPtcl for "[PtclGuess]"
substitute defined PotentialERoot for "[ERootGuess]"
substitute defined PotentialNoun for "[NounGuess]"
substitute defined PotentialPosRoot for "[PosRootGuess]"
substitute defined PotentialQuantQual for "[QuantQualGuess]"
substitute defined PotentialVerb for "[VerbGuess]"

eliminate flag VALENCE
define LexiconNoFlags;
define Lexicon LexiconNoFlags;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                                       !!!
!!!      Phoneme/Grapheme Definition      !!!
!!!                                       !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

define WordBoundary [ .#. ];
define MorphemeBoundary "^";

define Enclitic   [ ll u | ng u q ];

define Alphabet [ C | V | "*" | "'" | "-" ];
define MorphPhonSymbols [ "~"     | "~f"    | "~sf"   | "~h"    | "-w"    | ":"     | "–"     | "––" |
                          "@*"    | "@₁"    | "@₂"    |
                          "(e)"   | "(g)"   | "(ng₁)" | "(ng₂)" | "(t)"   | "(te)"  | "(i₁)"  | "(i₂)" | "(u)" | "(a)" | "(s)"   | "(at)"  |
						  "(g/t)" | "(p/v)" | "(s/z)" | "(t/y)" | "(i/u)" | "(pete)fte" | "@~–(g)ka" | "@~–(g)ke" |
                          "~f-w/-w" | "~sf-w:(e)tgun/teggun" | "@₁–lghii/@*ngugh*" | "@₁~fy/~f(ng₁)" | "@₁~flu/na" | "[Cond]" ];

define Lowercase "A"    -> a,
                 "I"    -> i,
                 "U"    -> u,
                 "E"    -> e,
                 "H"    -> h,
                 "P"    -> p,
                 "T"    -> t,
                 "K"    -> k,
                 "Kw"   -> k,
                 "Q"    -> q,
                 "Qw"   -> q,
                 "V"    -> v,
                 "L"    -> l,
                 "Z"    -> z,
                 "Y"    -> y, 
                 "R"    -> r,
                 "G"    -> g,
                 "W"    -> w,
                 "Gh"   -> gh,
                 "Ghw"  -> ghw,
                 "F"    -> f,
                 "Ll"   -> ll,
                 "S"    -> s,
                 "Rr"   -> rr,
                 "Gg"   -> gg,
                 "Wh"   -> wh,
                 "Ghh"  -> ghh,
                 "Ghhw" -> ghhw,
                 "M"    -> m,
                 "N"    -> n,
                 "Ng"   -> ng,
                 "Ngw"  -> ngw,
                 "Mm"   -> mm,
                 "Nn"   -> nn,
                 "Ngng" -> ngng,
                 "Ngngw"-> ngngw;

define InsertMorphBoundary [..] -> MorphemeBoundary || Alphabet _ MorphPhonSymbols ;

define CleanupMorphBoundary MorphemeBoundary -> 0 || WordBoundary Alphabet+ _ ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                   !!!
!!!      Filters      !!!
!!!                   !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

define PostbaseFilter ~[ ?* "@₁" "~" ":" "(u)" {te} "[V→V]" "-" "@₁" "~" ":" "(u)" {te} ?* ];

define Filters [
	PostbaseFilter
];


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                                    !!!
!!!      Morphophonological Rules      !!!
!!!                                    !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

define SemiAndFinalE [..] -> a || WordBoundary (C) a _ C e   MorphemeBoundary "~"    ∘  ! final e-hopping
                     [..] -> i || WordBoundary (C) i _ C e   MorphemeBoundary "~"    ∘  ! final e-hopping
                     [..] -> u || WordBoundary (C) u _ C e   MorphemeBoundary "~"    ∘  ! final e-hopping
                        e -> 0 ||                    V C _   MorphemeBoundary "~"    ∘  ! final e-dropping
                        e -> 0 ||    _   MorphemeBoundary  "~" (MorphPhonSymbols*) V ∘  ! final e-dropping  
                     [..] -> a || WordBoundary (C) a _ C e [g | gh ("*")] MorphemeBoundary "~" ∘  ! semi-final e-hopping
                     [..] -> i || WordBoundary (C) i _ C e [g | gh ("*")] MorphemeBoundary "~" ∘  ! semi-final e-hopping
                     [..] -> u || WordBoundary (C) u _ C e [g | gh ("*")] MorphemeBoundary "~" ∘  ! semi-final e-hopping
                        e -> 0 ||                    V C _ [g | gh ("*")] MorphemeBoundary "~" ∘  ! semi-final e-dropping
                      "~" -> 0 || WordBoundary Alphabet+ MorphemeBoundary _                    ;  ! finally remove intermediate symbol ~

define SemiFinalE [..] -> a || WordBoundary (C) a _ C e [g | gh ("*")] MorphemeBoundary "~sf" ∘  ! e-hopping
                  [..] -> i || WordBoundary (C) i _ C e [g | gh ("*")] MorphemeBoundary "~sf" ∘  ! e-hopping
                  [..] -> u || WordBoundary (C) u _ C e [g | gh ("*")] MorphemeBoundary "~sf" ∘  ! e-hopping
                     e -> 0 ||                    V C _ [g | gh ("*")] MorphemeBoundary "~sf" ∘  ! e-dropping
                 "~sf" -> 0 || WordBoundary Alphabet+ MorphemeBoundary _                      ;  ! finally remove intermediate symbol ~sf 
				 
define FinalE     [..] -> a || WordBoundary (C) a _ C e MorphemeBoundary "~f"     ∘  ! e-hopping
                  [..] -> i || WordBoundary (C) i _ C e MorphemeBoundary "~f"     ∘  ! e-hopping
                  [..] -> u || WordBoundary (C) u _ C e MorphemeBoundary "~f"     ∘  ! e-hopping
                     e -> 0 || WordBoundary Alphabet+ V C _ MorphemeBoundary "~f" ∘  ! e-dropping
                     e -> 0 || WordBoundary Alphabet+ _ MorphemeBoundary "~f" V   ∘  ! e-dropping
                  "~f" -> 0 || WordBoundary Alphabet+ MorphemeBoundary _          ;  ! finally remove intermediate symbol ~f

define NoHopNoDropE "~h" -> 0     || (C) DoubleVowel [Alphabet - t] e MorphemeBoundary _      ∘ ! do not drop e if e-hopping is not
                    "~h" -> 0     || [ C | V ] C V [Alphabet - t] e MorphemeBoundary _        ∘ ! possible unless e is preceded by t
					"~h" -> 0     || C e C MorphemeBoundary _ MorphPhonSymbols* C             ∘ ! do not drop semi-final e
					"~h" -> "~sf" || WordBoundary Alphabet+ MorphemeBoundary _ "-w" ":" "(e)" ∘ ! originally ~sf 
                    "~h" -> "~"   || WordBoundary Alphabet+ MorphemeBoundary _                ; ! originally ~

define InterConsonantalE "(e)" -> e || C (MorphemeBoundary) MorphPhonSymbols* _  ∘  ! convert (e) to e when following a consonant
                         "(e)" -> 0 || V ("*") ("*") (MorphemeBoundary) MorphPhonSymbols* _  ;  ! otherwise delete it
						 
define WeakFinalC  gh   -> 0 || [ WordBoundary | C ] FullVowel _ MorphemeBoundary [("~f") | ("~sf")] "-w"  ∘
                   "-w" -> 0 || WordBoundary Alphabet+ MorphemeBoundary (MorphPhonSymbols*)  _               ;

define UnmarkStrongGh gh "*" -> gh || WordBoundary Alphabet+ MorphPhonSymbols* _ ;

define FinalVCDrop V C -> 0 || WordBoundary Alphabet+ _ MorphemeBoundary "––" ∘
                   V   -> 0 || WordBoundary Alphabet+ _ MorphemeBoundary "––" ∘
                  "––" -> 0                                                   ;

define FinalConsonantDropAssimilation [ gh | g ] -> gh  || gh ("*") MorphemeBoundary ("~f") "–" _   ∘
                                      [ gh | g ] -> g   || g  MorphemeBoundary       ("~f") "–" _   ∘
                                      [ gh | g ] -> wh  || w   MorphemeBoundary ("~f") "–" _ VoicelessC ∘
                                      [ gh | g ] -> w   || w   MorphemeBoundary ("~f") "–" _ VoicedC    ∘
                                      [ gh | g ] -> ghw || ghw MorphemeBoundary ("~f") "–" _        ∘
                                      [  q | k ] -> qw  || [ qw | ghw ] MorphemeBoundary ("~f") "–" _  ∘
                                      [  q | k ] -> kw  || [ kw | w   ] MorphemeBoundary ("~f") "–" _  ∘
                                      [  q | k ] -> k   || [ k  | g   ] MorphemeBoundary ("~f") "–" _  ∘
                                      [  q | k ] -> q   || [ q  | gh ("*") ] MorphemeBoundary ("~f") "–" _ ∘
                                              ng -> ngw || w   MorphemeBoundary ("~f") "–" _           ∘
                 C ("*") MorphemeBoundary ("~f") -> MorphemeBoundary || _ "–"  ∘
                                             "–" -> 0   || WordBoundary Alphabet+ MorphemeBoundary (MorphPhonSymbols*) _  ;
